Maine, session 132, LD1079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 279 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 279
PERIMENOPAUSE AND MENOPAUSE EDUCATION
§1700-F. Perimenopause and menopause education materials
The department shall enter into partnerships with health care providers, including
obstetricians, gynecologists, primary care providers, nurse practitioners and physician
assistants, and community-based health care programs and hospitals to create and
disseminate informational materials in electronic and physical form to educate
menstruating persons and all individuals on the symptoms and processes of and other issues
surrounding perimenopause and menopause. The informational materials must include
symptoms of and treatments for perimenopause and menopause, symptoms of
perimenopause and menopause for which a person should contact a health care provider,
the biological process behind perimenopause and menopause, how to talk to family and
friends about perimenopause and menopause and any other information the department
determines necessary to prepare and educate individuals regarding perimenopause and
menopause.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides funding to create and disseminate informational materials on issues
surrounding perimenopause and menopause.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,000 $20,000
Page 1 - 132LR1262(03)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
Page 2 - 132LR1262(03)